Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1632.01
Community-wide directed health measure; approval; expiration; reauthorization.

A community-wide directed health measure (1) shall be subject to approval as provided in sections 71-1630 and 71-1632, (2) shall expire seven days after the date of issuance, and (3) may be reauthorized subject to approval as provided in sections 71-1630 and 71-1632.

Laws 2026, LB203, § 4.
July 18, 2026